District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.06

Conflict with federal law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or applied to necessarily require or excuse noncompliance with any provision of any federal law.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 806, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2075.
1973 Ed., § 6-1647.